Hawaii, session 2026, HB1562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that, according to a ten‑year study by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, nearly all indicators of children and adolescent mental health worsened between 2013 and 2023.  Disasters like the COVID-19 pandemic and the Maui wildfires in August 2023 have increased rates of depression and anxiety in the State's youth. The legislature further finds that prevention activities related to the promotion of mental health, such as early intervention, mental health education, and coping strategies, are critical to preventing the escalation of mental health disorders in the State's communities, potentially reducing the need for more intensive services in the future. Digital platforms that can be accessed with mobile devices can provide a powerful public health service, especially for youth, by: (1)  Expanding the reach of mental health education and prevention by making it more convenient and inclusive, especially for children and adolescents in remote or underserved areas where in-person programs may be limited; (2)  Reducing stigma by making it easier for youth to explore resources without fear of judgment; (3)  Enhancing engagement and interactivity by allowing youth to guide their own learning; (4)  Tailoring content to the needs of the user; (5)  Providing a cost-effective way to reach a large audience; (6)  Addressing lower-level needs so the behavioral health workforce, which is scarce, can focus on youth with the highest level of need; (7)  Providing information that is continually updated to reflect the latest research and resources; and (8)  Collecting critical data about community mental health needs. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a one-year digital youth mental health platform pilot project that will enable the child and adolescent mental health division of the department of health to develop and make publicly available a digital platform designed to help young people address and manage mental health challenges. SECTION 2. (a)  The child and adolescent mental health division of the department of health shall implement and administer a digital youth mental health platform pilot project.  The pilot project shall commence on July 1, 2026, and end on June 30, 2027. (b)  Under the pilot project, the child and adolescent mental health division shall contract for the following services: (1)  Development, management, and hosting services for the digital youth mental health platform.  The child and adolescent mental health division shall oversee the development of a platform that is evidence-based, peer-reviewed, confidential, and responsive.  The platform shall provide: (A)  County specific resources; (B)  Mental health education; (C)  Self-care strategies; (D)  Healthy coping strategies; and (E)  Data regarding mental health needs in the State; and (2)  Communication and marketing services.  The child and adolescent mental health division shall manage the communications and marketing services, which include: (A)  Development of a communications and marketing plan; (B)  Creation of ad campaign materials inclusive of print, radio, digital, and television ads and the respective media buys; (C)  Planning and management of community and outreach events; and (D)  Social media campaign and management. (c) Procurement for development, management, and hosting services and communication and marketing services for the purposes of this Act shall be exempt from chapters 103D and 103F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, only for the duration of the pilot program, not to exceed June 30, 2027. (d) The child and adolescent mental health division shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, regarding the digital youth mental health platform pilot project to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation and administration of the digital youth mental health platform pilot project. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.